Massachusetts, session 194th, H4441.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2.2 of article II of the charter of the town of Nantucket, as
established by chapter 289 of the acts of 1996, as amended, which is on file in the office of the
archivist of the commonwealth, as provided in section 12 of chapter 43B of the General Laws, is
hereby amended by striking out the words “one year” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- three years.
SECTION 2. Section 2.4 of said article II of said charter is hereby amended by inserting
after the words “Moderator shall appoint a clerk” the following words:- , who shall be a
registered voter of the town.
of 3

SECTION 3. Subsection (b) of section 2.5 of said article II of said charter is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “after the issuance of the warrant” the following words:-
and make a copy of the warrant available on the town website.
SECTION 4. Subsection (c) of said section 2.5 of said article II of said charter is hereby
amended by striking out the word “seven” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
fourteen.
SECTION 5. Said section 2.5 of said article II of said charter is hereby amended by
inserting after subsection (c) the following new subsection:- (d) Notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the Select Board shall insert in the warrant for the annual meeting all
subjects the insertion of which has been requested of them in writing by fifty or more registered
voters of the town and in the warrant for every special town meeting all subjects the insertion of
which has been requested of them in writing by one hundred registered voters.
SECTION 6. Section 2.6 of said article II of said charter is hereby amended by inserting
at the end of said section the following words:- The Moderator, in his or her sole discretion, may
permit additional nonresident property owners to speak at any annual or special Town Meeting
on matters before the Meeting.
SECTION 7. Paragraph (14) of subsection (d) of section 4.2 of article IV of said charter
is hereby amended by striking out the words “before such warrants are submitted to the Select
Board” and by inserting after the words “shall approve” the following words:- and sign.
SECTION 8. Subsection (a) of section 4.3 of said article IV of said charter is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “shall appoint the” the following word:- department.
of 3

SECTION 9. Subsection (c) of section 5.4 of article V of said charter is hereby amended
by inserting after the words “at least 20% of registered voters” the following words:- , as
established by the Town Clerk as of March 1st of the previous year.
SECTION 10. Subsection (d) of said section 5.4 of said article V of said charter is hereby
amended by striking out the numeral “7” after the words “does not resign within” and inserting
in place thereof the following numeral:- 5.
SECTION 11. Said subsection (d) of said section 5.4 of said article V of said charter is
hereby further amended by striking out the words “not less than 75 days after such certification
date” and inserting after the words “the Select Board shall” the following words:- not less than
75 days after such certification date.
SECTION 12. Subsection (f) of said section 5.4 of said article V of said charter is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “For the recall of (name” the following words:- and title.
SECTION 13. Said subsection (f) of said section 5.4 of said article V of said charter is
hereby further amended by inserting after the words “Against the recall of (name” the following
words:- and title.
SECTION 14. Article VI of said charter is hereby amended by striking out Section 6.6 in
its entirety.
of 3